src/fst/incoming/dem.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+Dem
+Dim
+A
+I
+Sg
+Pl
+Stat
+Movg
+Invs
+Narr
+Vblz
+Obv
am
amo
ann
anno
om
%>

LEXICON Root
Dem ;

LEXICON Dem
am+Dem:am Dem_num_suffixes ;
am+Dem+Dim:amsst Dem_num_suffixes ;
amo+Dem:amo Dem_num_suffixes ;
amo+Dem+Dim:amssto Dem_num_suffixes ;
ann+Dem:ann Dem_num_suffixes ;
ann+Dem+Dim:annst Dem_num_suffixes ;
anno+Dem:anno Dem_num_suffixes ;
anno+Dem+Dim:annssto Dem_num_suffixes ;
om+Dem:om Dem_num_suffixes ;
om+Dem+Dim:omsst Dem_num_suffixes ;

LEXICON Dem_num_suffixes
+A+Sg:%>wa Dem_postinfl ;
+I+Sg:%>yi Dem_postinfl ;
+A+Obv:%>yi Dem_postinfl ;
+A+Pl:%>iksi Dem_postinfl ;
+I+Pl:%>istsi Dem_postinfl ;

LEXICON Dem_postinfl
+Stat:%>ma Vblz ;
+Movg:%>ya Vblz ;
+Invs:%>hka Vblz ;
+Narr:%>ka Vblz ;
0 Vblz ;

LEXICON Vblz
+Vblz+Sg:%>ao'ka # ;
+Vblz+Pl:%>ayi # ;
0 # ;
